src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The LUO language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V_
+V: # ;
LEXICON V_CHWEYO
+V: #;
LEXICON V_NENO
+V: #;
LEXICON V_WACHO
+V0@U.Sc.NO@:%>o@U.Sc.NO@ INF ;
+V:%>o INDICATIVE ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE
+Ind+Fut@R.TMA1.IndFut@@D.TMA2@:00@R.TMA1.IndFut@@D.TMA2@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;
+Ind+Prs@R.TMA1.IndPrs@@D.TMA2@:00@R.TMA1.IndPrs@@D.TMA2@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;
+Ind+Prt@R.TMA1.IndPrt@@D.TMA2@:00@R.TMA1.IndPrt@@D.TMA2@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;
@R.TMA2.se@ PERFECT-CHOOSE ;
+Opt+Prs@R.TMA1.OptPrs@@D.TMA2@:00@R.TMA1.OptPrs@@D.TMA2@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;

LEXICON PERFECT-CHOOSE
+Ind+Prf@U.TMA1.IndPrs@:00@U.TMA1.IndPrs@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;
+Ind+PluPrf@U.TMA1.IndPrt@:00@U.TMA1.IndPrt@ INDICATIVE-4-SC ;


LEXICON INDICATIVE-4-SC
@U.Sc.Sg1@ SCSG1 ;
@U.Sc.Sg2@ SCSG2 ;
@U.Sc.Sg3@ SCSG3 ;
@U.Sc.Pl1@ SCPL1 ;
@U.Sc.Pl2@ SCPL2 ;
@U.Sc.Pl3@ SCPL3 ;

LEXICON SCPL1
+ScPl1: # ;
+ScPl10@U.Oc.Sg2@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg2@ OCSG2 ;
+ScPl10@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScPl10@U.Oc.Pl2@:@U.Oc.Pl2@ OCPL2 ;
+ScPl10@U.Oc.Pl3@:@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;

LEXICON SCPL2
+ScPl2: # ;
+ScPl20@U.Oc.Sg1@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg1@ OCSG1 ;
+ScPl20@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScPl20@U.Oc.Pl1@:%>n@U.Oc.Pl1@ OCPL1 ;
+ScPl2@U.Oc.Pl3@:0@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;

LEXICON SCPL3
+ScPl3: # ;
+ScPl30@U.Oc.Sg1@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg1@ OCSG1 ;
+ScPl30@U.Oc.Sg2@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg2@ OCSG2 ;
+ScPl30@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScPl30@U.Oc.Pl1@:%>n@U.Oc.Pl1@ OCPL1 ;
+ScPl3@U.Oc.Pl2@:0@U.Oc.Pl2@ OCPL2 ;
+ScPl3@U.Oc.Pl3@:0@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;


LEXICON SCSG1
+ScSg1: # ;
+ScSg10@U.Oc.Sg2@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg2@ OCSG2 ;
+ScSg10@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScSg10@U.Oc.Pl2@:@U.Oc.Pl2@ OCPL2 ;
+ScSg10@U.Oc.Pl3@:@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;
LEXICON SCSG2
+ScSg2: # ;
+ScSg20@U.Oc.Sg1@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg1@ OCSG1 ;
+ScSg20@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScSg20@U.Oc.Pl1@:%>n@U.Oc.Pl1@ OCPL1 ;
+ScSg2@U.Oc.Pl3@:0@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;

LEXICON SCSG3
+ScSg3: # ;
+ScSg30@U.Oc.Sg1@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg1@ OCSG1 ;
+ScSg30@U.Oc.Sg2@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg2@ OCSG2 ;
+ScSg30@U.Oc.Sg3@:%>n@U.Oc.Sg3@ OCSG3 ;
+ScSg30@U.Oc.Pl1@:%>n@U.Oc.Pl1@ OCPL1 ;
+ScSg3@U.Oc.Pl2@:0@U.Oc.Pl2@ OCPL2 ;
+ScSg3@U.Oc.Pl3@:0@U.Oc.Pl3@ OCPL3 ;

LEXICON OCPL1
+OcPl1:%>wa # ;
LEXICON OCPL2
+OcPl2:%>u # ;
LEXICON OCPL3
+OcPl3:%>gi # ;

LEXICON OCSG1
+OcSg1:%>a # ;
LEXICON OCSG2
+OcSg2:%>i # ;
LEXICON OCSG3
+OcSg3:%>e # ;

LEXICON INF
+Inf: # ;

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
